Mississippi statutes. Title 81. Banks and Financial Institutions
Article 7. Loans and Investments.

§ 81-14-301.
Investment in loans.

Subject to the regulations of the commissioner, a savings bank may loan funds as follows:

On the security of deposit accounts, but no such loan shall exceed the withdrawal value of the pledged account.

On the security of real estate:

Of a value, determined in accordance with regulations adopted by the commissioner, sufficient to provide good and ample security for the loan;

With a fee simple title or a leasehold title having a duration of not less than ten (10) years beyond the maturity of the loan;

With the title established by evidence of title as is consistent with sound lending practices in the locality;

With the security interest in real estate evidenced by an appropriate written instrument and the loan evidenced by a note, bond or similar written instrument; a loan on the security of the whole of the beneficial interest in a land trust satisfies the requirements of this section if the title to the land is held by a corporate trustee and if the real estate held in the land trust meets the other requirements of this section.

For the purpose of repair, improvement, rehabilitation, furnishing or equipment of real estate.

Through the participation of loans that are of a type that the savings bank would be authorized to make in accordance with this section and its bylaws. Subject to regulations by the commissioner, participants shall be limited to federally insured financial institutions and their subsidiaries, and instruments of, or corporations owned wholly or in part by, the United States or this state.

Through the purchase of loans, wholly or in part, that at the time of purchase, the savings bank could make in accordance with this section and its bylaws.

Through the purchase of installment contracts for the sale of real estate and title thereto that is subject to the contracts, but in each instance only if the savings bank, at the time of purchase, could make a mortgage loan of the same amount for the same length of time on the security of real estate.

Through loans guaranteed or insured, wholly or in part, by the United States or any of its instrumentalities.

Subject to regulations adopted by the commissioner, through secured or unsecured loans for business, corporate, commercial or agricultural purposes; provided that the total of all loans granted under this paragraph shall not exceed fifteen percent (15%) of the savings bank’s total assets.

For the purpose of mobile home financing subject, however, to the regulation of the commissioner.

Through loans secured by the cash surrender value of any life insurance policy or any collateral that would be a legal investment under the terms of this chapter if made by a savings bank.

Any provisions of this chapter to the contrary, notwithstanding and subject to the commissioner’s regulations, any savings bank may make any loans or investment or engage in any activity that it could make or engage in if it were organized under state law as a savings and loan association or under federal law as a federal savings and loan association or federal savings bank.

A savings bank may issue letters of credit or other similar arrangements only as provided by regulation of the commissioner with regard to aggregate amounts permitted, take out commitments for standby letters of credit, underlying documentation and underwriting, legal limitations on loans of the savings bank, control and subsidiary records, and other procedures deemed necessary by the commissioner.

For the purpose of secured and unsecured financing of personal and family credits, subject to the regulations of the commissioner.

For the purpose of financing primary, secondary, undergraduate or postgraduate education.

Through revolving lines of credit on the security of a first or junior lien on the borrower’s personal residence, based primarily on the borrower’s equity, the proceeds of which may be used for any purpose.

As secured or unsecured credit to cover the payment of checks, drafts or other funds transfer orders in excess of the available balance of an account on which they are drawn, subject to the regulations of the commissioner.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1992, ch. 489, § 73; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 364, § 75; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 457, § 75, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-14-303.
Other investments.

If the board of directors determines at any time that funds are available in excess of the demands and needs for loans, maturities and withdrawals, a savings bank may invest funds as provided in this section:

In demand, time or savings deposits or accounts, withdrawable accounts, or other insured obligations of any financial institution, the accounts of which are insured by a federal agency.

In obligations of, or obligations that are fully guaranteed by the United States, and in stocks or obligations of any Federal Reserve Bank, Federal Home Loan Bank, the Student Loan Market Association, the Government National Mortgage Association, the Federal Home Loan Mortgage Corporation, the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation, or any other agency of the United States.

In bonds or other direct obligations of, or guaranteed as to principal and interest by, this state.

In bonds or other evidences of indebtedness that are direct general obligations of any unit of local government of this state, or other evidences of indebtedness that are payable from revenues or earnings specifically pledged therefor of a unit of local government, but in no event shall the total amount of the securities of any one (1) maker or obligor exceed fifteen percent (15%) of the savings bank’s total capital, nor shall the aggregate amount of investments under this paragraph exceed fifteen percent (15%) of the savings bank’s total assets.

In real estate for the following purposes:

A savings bank may invest in real property and equipment and in leasehold improvements to rented facilities necessary for the conduct of its business and in real property to be held for its future use. A savings bank may invest in an office building or buildings and appurtenances for the purpose of the transaction of the savings bank’s business. No such investment may be made without the prior written approval of the commissioner if the total amount of such investments exceeds fifty percent (50%) of the savings bank’s net worth. Facilities, furniture and fixtures leased for the purpose set forth in this section shall not be included in this limitation.

With the prior written consent of the commissioner, a savings bank may invest in the initial purchase and development, or the purchase or commitment to purchase after completion, of home sites and housing for sale or rent, including, but not limited to: (A) projects for the reconstruction, rehabilitation or rebuilding of residential properties to meet the minimum standards of health and occupancy prescribed by appropriate local authorities; (B) the provision of accommodations for retail stores and other community services that are reasonably incident to such housing; or (C) in the shares of a corporation that owns one or more of those projects and that is wholly owned by one or more financial institutions whose investments are regulated by the laws of this state or of the United States. In no event shall the total investment in any one (1) project exceed fifteen percent (15%) of the savings bank’s net worth, nor shall the aggregate investment under this paragraph exceed fifty percent (50%) of its net worth.

No savings bank may make an investment unless it is in compliance with the net worth requirements of this chapter and with the net worth maintenance requirements of its insurer of deposit accounts. The commissioner shall approve the investment only if the savings bank shows:

That the savings bank has adequate assets available for the investment;

That the proposed investment does not exceed the reasonable market value of the property or interest therein as determined in accordance with the appraisal requirements of this chapter; and

That all other requirements of this section have been met.

Nothing contained in this paragraph prohibits a savings bank from developing or building on land acquired by it under any other provision of this chapter nor from completing the construction of buildings in accordance with any construction loan contract where the borrower has failed to comply with the terms of the contract.

In stocks or obligations of business development corporations chartered by this state or by the United States or an agency thereof, but in no event shall the aggregate amount of stock exceed two and one-half percent (2-1/2%) of the savings bank’s total capital or Two Hundred Fifty Thousand Dollars ($250,000.00), whichever is greater.

In obligations of urban renewal investment corporations chartered under the laws of this state, or the United States, or in certificates of beneficial interest of urban renewal investment trusts, but in no event shall the aggregate amount of the stock, obligations or beneficial interest certificates of any one (1) maker exceed two and one-half percent (2-1/2%) of the savings bank’s total capital, nor shall the aggregate amount of investments under this paragraph exceed fifteen percent (15%) of its total capital.

In commercial paper. As used in this section, the term “commercial paper” means short-term obligations having a maturity ranging from two (2) to two hundred seventy (270) days issued by banks, corporations or other borrowers. Investments in commercial paper under this section must be in securities rated in one (1) of the two (2) highest categories by at least two (2) nationally recognized investment rating services.

Purchase of stock in insurance companies. Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter to the contrary, a savings bank may purchase shares of, or otherwise acquire equity interest in, insurance companies and insurance holding companies organized to provide insurance for savings institutions and corporations and individuals affiliated with savings institutions; provided, however, that ownership of equity interest is a prerequisite to obtaining director’s, officer’s and blanket bond insurance through the company or companies. The commissioner may promulgate regulations concerning the size of each savings bank’s investment and manner of holding those investments.

Subject to the regulation of the commissioner, in equity or debt securities or instruments of a service corporation that is a subsidiary of the savings bank.

Through advances of federal funds to designated depositories, provided that the advances are made on the condition that they be repaid on the next business day following the date on which the advance is made. For the purpose of this paragraph, the term “federal funds” means funds that a savings bank has on deposit at a depository that are exchangeable for funds on deposit at a federal reserve bank; the term “business day” means any day on which the savings bank, the depository and the federal reserve bank where the funds are on deposit are all open for general business.

In marketable investment securities, but in no event shall the total amount of those securities of any one (1) maker or obligor exceed five percent (5%) of the savings bank’s total capital, nor shall the aggregate amount of investments under this section exceed fifteen percent (15%) of total capital. As used in this section, the term “marketable investment securities” does not include stock, but means investment grade marketable obligations evidencing indebtedness of any person in the form of bonds, notes or debentures commonly known as investment securities, and of a type customarily sold on recognized exchanges or traded over the counter. As used in this section, the term “investment grade” means being rated in one (1) of the two (2) highest categories by at least two (2) nationally recognized investment rating services. As used in this section, the term “person” means an individual corporation, partnership, joint venture, trust, estate or unincorporated association.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1992, ch. 489, § 74; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 364, § 76; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 457, § 76, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-14-305.
Prohibited security.

No savings bank, or subsidiary thereof, may accept its own capital stock or its own mutual capital certificates as security for any loan made by such savings bank. Further, no loans of any type shall be made, either directly or indirectly, for purposes relating to its own stock.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1992, ch. 489, § 75; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 364, § 77; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 457, § 77, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-14-307.
Loan conditioned on certain transactions prohibited.

No savings bank, or subsidiary thereof, shall require as a condition of making a loan that the borrower contract with any specific person or organization for particular goods or services.

A savings bank, or subsidiary thereof, must notify borrowers at or prior to the loan commitment of their right to select the attorney or law firm rendering legal services in connection with the loan, and the person or organization rendering insurance services in connection with the loan. Notwithstanding the notice requirement, a savings bank, or subsidiary thereof, may refuse to make any loan if it believes on reasonable grounds that the services provided by the person or organization selected by the borrower will afford insufficient protection to such institution or subsidiary.

A savings bank, or subsidiary thereof, may require borrowers to reimburse such savings bank for legal services rendered by its own attorney only when the fee is limited to legal services required by the making of such loan and the borrower has selected the savings bank’s attorney in the manner provided by subsection (2) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1992, ch. 489, § 76; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 364, § 78; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 457, § 78, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-14-309.
Loan expense and fees.

A savings bank may require borrowers to pay all reasonable expenses incurred by the savings bank in connection with making, closing, disbursing, extending, adjusting or renewing loans.

A savings bank may require a borrower to pay reasonable charges for late payments made during the course of repayment of a loan. Such payments may be levied only upon such terms and conditions as fixed by the savings bank’s board of directors and agreed to by the borrower in the loan contract. Such payments shall not be considered interest under the usury laws of this state.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1992, ch. 489, § 77; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 364, § 79; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 457, § 79, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-14-311.
Methods of loan repayment.

Subject to such rules and regulations as the commissioner may prescribe, a savings bank shall agree in writing with borrowers as to the method or plan by which an indebtedness shall be repaid.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1992, ch. 489, § 78; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 364, § 80; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 457, § 80, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-14-313.
Insider loans.

Loans aggregating fifteen percent (15%) of the unimpaired capital and unimpaired surplus may be made by any state savings bank to any director or executive officer thereof, as defined in Regulation O promulgated by the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System, less existing direct and indirect liabilities thereto, upon affirmative approval of a majority of all directors spread on the minutes of a directors’ meeting held before such loan is made, provided, such loan is made on substantially the same terms and conditions extended to other borrowers for comparable transactions. Any state savings bank may lend to any such director or executive officer thereof, upon affirmative approval of a majority of all directors spread on the minutes of a directors’ meeting held before such loan is made, not more than twenty percent (20%) of the unimpaired capital and unimpaired surplus of the savings bank, less the amount of existing direct and indirect liabilities, when se cured; or when the portion thereof in excess of any amount loaned under the first provision hereof is secured by obligations of the United States government, the State of Mississippi, and the levee districts, counties, road districts, school districts, and municipalities of the State of Mississippi, obligations of any other state of the United States and other bonds of recognized character and standing, which are the subject of daily newspaper market quotations, provided such loan shall not exceed eighty percent (80%) of the market or par value (whichever is less) of the bonds or obligations offered as security. Any state savings bank may lend to any executive officer or director thereof upon affirmative approval of a majority of all directors spread on the minutes of a directors’ meeting held before such loan is made, such amount as is safe and proper, when secured by warehouse receipts or shippers’ order bills of lading representing actual existing values, provided the amount loaned shall not exceed eighty percent (80%) of the market value of the commodities representing the actual existing values, and loans of this nature shall be made payable on demand so that the security held therefor may be sold on any date and the proceeds thereof applied to the payment of the loan. However, a savings bank’s board of directors may, as shown in its minutes, give to a savings bank officer the authority to make secured or unsecured loans to an executive officer or director of such savings bank, without receiving the board’s prior approval, in an amount that, when aggregated with the amount of all other extensions of credit to that person and to all related interests of that person, does not exceed the greater of Twenty-five Thousand Dollars ($25,000.00) or five percent (5%) of the savings bank’s unimpaired capital and unimpaired surplus. However, no state savings bank shall extend credit to any director or executive officer thereof, in an amount that, when aggregated with all other extensions of credit to that person and to all related interests of that person, exceeds Five Hundred Thousand Dollars ($500,000.00) without documented prior affirmative approval of a majority of its directors.

Loans and discounts by a state savings bank to a director or executive officer thereof secured in full by funds on deposit in time or savings accounts with the lending savings bank to the credit of the borrower shall not be restricted to the fifteen percent (15%) or twenty percent (20%) limitations herein prescribed.

The limitations of this section shall not apply where an executive officer or director shall bona fide purchase from the savings bank at a reasonable price real or personal property acquired by the savings bank in payment of debts due the savings bank, provided such transactions are approved by a majority of the board of directors, such approval to be shown in their minutes; and, in cases where loans are made by branch offices, the sum total of loans made by any branch or branches and its parent savings bank to such executive officer or director shall be computed as against the total capital stock and surplus of the parent savings bank and its branch or branches. Loans heretofore made to executive officers or directors may be renewed or extended if in accord with sound banking practice.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1992, ch. 489, § 79; Laws, 1996, ch. 400, § 37; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 364, § 81; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 457, § 81, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-14-315.
Rule-making power of commissioner.

The commissioner shall, from time to time, promulgate such rules and regulations in respect to loans permitted to be made by state savings banks as necessary to assure that such loans are keeping with sound lending practices and to promote the purpose of this chapter.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1992, ch. 489, § 80; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 364, § 82; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 457, § 82, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-14-317.
Nonconforming loans and investments.

Unless otherwise provided, every loan or other investment made in violation of this chapter shall be due and payable according to its terms and the obligation thereof shall not be impaired; provided, however, that such violation consists only of the lending of an excessive sum on authorized security or of investing in an unauthorized investment.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1992, ch. 489, § 81; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 364, § 83; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 457, § 83, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-14-319.
Limitation on loans to one (1) borrower.

The liability to a savings bank by a person, company, corporation or firm for money loaned, including in the liability of such person, company or firm, where a partnership, the liabilities of the several members thereof, shall not exceed twenty percent (20%) of the aggregate unimpaired capital and unimpaired surplus of said savings bank.

The following shall not be restricted to or considered as coming within the limitations of twenty percent (20%) herein prescribed:

Loans and discounts secured by warehouse receipts or shippers’ order bills of lading representing actual existing values, provided the amount of such loans and discounts shall not exceed eighty-five percent (85%) of the market value of the commodities representing the actual existing values.

Loans and discounts secured by bonds, certificates or notes constituting direct obligations of the United States government, or bonds fully guaranteed by the United States government, or by full faith and credit obligations of the State of Mississippi; provided, however, the commissioner shall from time to time determine and fix the maximum percentage of the par value of all such securities that may be loaned.

Loans and discounts to the extent that they are secured or covered by guaranties, or by commitments, or agreements to take over or purchase the same, made by any federal reserve bank, or by the United States, or any department, bureau, board, commission or establishment of the United States, including any corporation wholly owned directly or indirectly by the United States; provided that such guaranties, agreements or commitments are unconditional and are to be performed by payment within sixty (60) days after demand; provided, further, that the commissioner is hereby authorized to define the terms herein used and may by regulation control the making of loans under this paragraph (c).

Loans and discounts secured in full by funds on deposit in time or savings accounts with the lending savings bank to the credit of the borrower.

Any officer or director who shall approve or make loans prohibited in this section shall be liable individually for the full amount of the principal and interest of any such loan. If the commissioner shall discover, in any examination of any open savings bank that there is a loss on any loan made in violation of this section, he shall make demand of all directors and officers approving or making such loan for payment of the entire unpaid balance on any such loan.

Like demand shall be made and suit brought by the receiver of any savings bank in liquidation. Provided, however, this section shall not apply to loans to the State of Mississippi, or to any political subdivision thereof, nor to any levee district.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1992, ch. 489, § 82; Laws, 1996, ch. 400, § 38; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 364, § 84; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 457, § 84, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-14-321.
General parity provision.

State savings banks shall have and possess the rights, powers, privileges, immunities, duties and obligations of thrift institutions organized and operating under the laws of this state or the federal government as may be prescribed by the board by general regulation under the circumstances and conditions set out therein. In the event of a conflict between the provisions of this paragraph and any other provision of this chapter, the provisions of this paragraph shall control.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1992, ch. 489, § 83; Laws, 1996, ch. 338, § 1; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 364, § 85; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 457, § 85, eff from and after July 1, 2001.